Hawaii statutes.
CHAPTER
802

COUNSEL
AND OTHER SERVICES FOR INDIGENT

CRIMINAL
DEFENDANTS

Section

802-1 Right to representation by public defender
or other

appointed counsel

802-2 Notification of right to representation

802-3 Request for appointment of counsel

802-4 Determination of indigency

802-5 Appointment of counsel; compensation

802-6 Subsequent ability to pay counsel

802-7 Litigation expenses

802-8 Office of the state public defender

802-9 Defender council

802-10 Repealed

802-11 Appointment of state public defender

802-12 Organization of office; assistance

Cross References

Surcharge for indigent legal services, see §607-5.7.

Previous
Vol14_Ch0701-0853
Next